Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 28 Injunctions

Cross references. —

As to injunction pending appeal, see Rule 62(c), W.R.C.P.

As to injunctions generally, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

Equitable nature of relief. —

Although actions for injunctive relief are authorized by this chapter, they are, by nature, requests for equitable relief that are not granted as a matter of right, but are within the lower court's equitable discretion. Weiss v. Pedersen, 933 P.2d 495,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1997), overruled in part, White v. Allen, 2003 WY 39, 65 P.3d 395,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

42 Am. Jur. 2d Injunctions § 1 et seq.

Propriety of federal court injunction against suit in foreign country, 78 ALR Fed 831.

43A C.J.S. Injunctions § 1 et seq.

§ 1-28-101.
“Injunction” defined.

An injunction is a command
to refrain from a particular act. It may be the final judgment in
an action or may be allowed as a provisional remedy, and when so allowed
it is by order.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 571; R.S. 1887, § 2919; R.S. 1899, § 4038; C.S. 1910, § 4897; C.S. 1920, § 6167; R.S. 1931, § 89-3501; C.S. 1945, § 3-6601; W.S. 1957, § 1-856; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-29-101

.

Temporary injunction. —

Motion for new trial in district court is not necessary to obtain review of an order denying motion to dissolve temporary injunction allowed pendente lite. Anderson v. Englehart, 18 Wyo. 196, 105 P. 571,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1909).

A temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is in the nature of a provisional remedy

and may be issued at any time during the pending litigation. Weber v. Johnston Fuel Liners, 519 P.2d 972,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1974).

A suit for injunction is a civil suit

and the rules of procedure are the same as in any other civil suit. Weber v. Johnston Fuel Liners, 519 P.2d 972,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1974).

Injunction pendente lite. —

Where, in an action for recovery or possession of realty, defendant answers setting up as affirmative matter a contract for sale which plaintiff is unable to carry out, and prays for damages, or, in alternative, for specific performance, defendant is entitled to injunction pendente lite to protect her possession of the property; and fact that her answer is not styled cross-petition or counterclaim is immaterial. Weaver v. Richardson, 21 Wyo. 343, 132 P. 1148,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1913).

Specificity. —

An injunction enjoining land owners from interfering with an irrigation company's access to and repair of its facilities across the owners' land was proper and specific enough where there was absolutely no possibility of uncertainty or confusion and where the merits of the case had already been decided and the latest injunction merely told the owners for the third time that they were restrained from interfering with the company's access to its facilities. Wilson v. Lucerne Canal & Power Co., 2003 WY 126, 77 P.3d 412,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2003).

Nature of remedy. —

Injunction is equitable remedy. Norris v. United Mineral Prods. Co., 61 Wyo. 386, 158 P.2d 679,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1945).

Stated

in

Olson v. Leith, 71 Wyo. 316, 257 P.2d 342,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1953).

Cited

in

Polo Ranch Co. v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 15, 61 P.3d 1255,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2003); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 1-28-102.
Causes for injunction; granting temporary order.

When it appears by the
petition that the plaintiff is entitled to relief consisting of restraining
the commission or continuance of some act the commission or continuance
of which during the litigation would produce great or irreparable
injury to the plaintiff, or when during the litigation it appears
that the defendant is doing, threatens to do, or is procuring to be
done some act in violation of the plaintiff’s rights respecting the
subject of the action and tending to render the judgment ineffectual,
a temporary order may be granted restraining the act. The order may
also be granted in any case where it is specially authorized by statute
and by municipal ordinance adopted pursuant to W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xlvi).

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 572; R.S. 1887, § 2920; R.S. 1899, § 4039; C.S. 1910, § 4898; C.S. 1920, § 6168; R.S. 1931, § 89-3502; C.S. 1945, § 3-6602; W.S. 1957, § 1-857; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-29-102

; Laws 1991, ch. 206, § 1.

Time of issuance. —

A temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is in the nature of a provisional remedy and may be issued at any time during the pending litigation. Weber v. Johnston Fuel Liners, 519 P.2d 972,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1974).

Where injunction wrongfully issued. —

If the plaintiff prevails in the final hearing on the injunction, the defendant cannot recover even if the temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction was wrongfully issued. However, good sense and equity dictate an exception to this rule when the temporary restraining order is overly broad or too far-reaching in scope. Weber v. Johnston Fuel Liners, 519 P.2d 972,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1974).

Preliminary Injunction Proper. —

In a matter arising out of non-compete agreements, a district court did not err in granting a preliminary injunction against employees because there was a substantial likelihood of success on the merits, and a technology company would suffer immediate and irreparable harm if the employees and their business were allowed to compete.
CBM Geosolutions, Inc. v. Gas Sensing Tech. Corp., 2009 WY 113, 215 P.3d 1054,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2009).

Complaint which fails to state why damage action insufficient
properly dismissed. —

The court did not err in dismissing a claim for injunctive relief. The complaint lacked allegations of facts justifying its conclusions that the plaintiff had no adequate remedy at law, and that failure to grant the injunction would result in irreparable injury. In particular, the complaint failed to state why an action at law for recovery of monetary damages, which is all that was pleaded, would have been an insufficient remedy. Rialto Theatre, Inc. v. Commonwealth Theatres, Inc., 714 P.2d 328,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 469

(Wyo. 1986).

Restraining use of letters. —

Under this section, writer and addressee of letters obtained by defendant and used in divorce suit was entitled to temporary injunction, restraining her from gaining access to the letters or publishing them. King v. King, 25 Wyo. 275, 168 P. 730,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1917).

Cited

in

Weaver v. Richardson, 21 Wyo. 343, 132 P. 1148,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1913).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Injunction to prevent insured from settling suit against wrongdoer to detriment of insurer, 51 ALR2d 697.

Injunction against attorney's representation of interest adverse to that of former client, 52 ALR2d 1243.

Rights of parents to injunction with respect to names of children, 53 ALR2d 914.

Dismissal of suit for injunction as conclusively establishing that temporary injunction had been improvidently granted, 54 ALR2d 473.

Injunction against suit in another state or country for divorce or separation, 54 ALR2d 1240.

Injunction against repeated or continuing trespasses involving waters and water rights, 60 ALR2d 310.

Injunction against repeated or continuing trespasses on real property, 60 ALR2d 310.

Name appropriation by employer or former employer, 52 ALR4th 156.

Enforceability of sale-of-business agreement not to compete against nonsigner or nonowning signer, 60 ALR4th 294.

§ 1-28-103.
When and by whom granted.

The injunction may be
granted at the time of commencing the action, or at any time before
judgment, by the district court or a judge thereof, or in the absence
from the county of the judge, by the court commissioner of the county,
when it appears by affidavit of the plaintiff or his agent that the
plaintiff is entitled thereto. When an injunction has been vacated
during the pendency of the action in the district court, and an appeal
is taken to the supreme court from the judgment or final order after
trial in the district court, an injunction may be granted at any time
before judgment or final order in the supreme court by a judge of
the supreme court, when it appears to the court or judge by affidavit
of the party or his agent that the party is entitled thereto. Upon
like proof, an injunction may also be allowed by the supreme or district
court or by a judge of either as a temporary remedy, during the pendency
of a case on error or appeal.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 573; R.S. 1887, § 2921; R.S. 1899, § 4040; C.S. 1910, § 4899; C.S. 1920, § 6169; R.S. 1931, § 89-3503; C.S. 1945, § 3-6603; W.S. 1957, § 1-858; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-29-103

.

Cross references. —

As to jurisdiction of district court to issue injunction, see also art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const.

In general. —

An injunction may be granted at time of commencing action. McBride v. Union Pac. R.R., 3 Wyo. 247, 21 P. 687,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1889).

This section is not superseded by the

Weber v. Johnston Fuel Liners, Inc., 519 P.2d 972,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1974).

Verification of petition sufficient. —

This section, requiring affidavits on application for an injunction, is satisfied where petition containing the requisite averments is properly verified. Anderson v. Englehart, 18 Wyo. 409, 108 P. 977,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1910).

Equity jurisdiction. —

The jurisdiction of a court of equity is, in absence of statute, limited to protection of property rights, and it has no jurisdiction to restrain prosecution of a criminal proceeding. Littleton v. Burgess, 14 Wyo. 173, 82 P. 864,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1905).

Inclusion of distant lands. —

In suit to enjoin defendants from driving cattle over plaintiff's lands, decree should not include an injunction as to lands, described in complaint, several miles distant from those trespassed upon, and as to which there was no showing that defendants had in any way trespassed or threatened so to do. Martin v. Platte Valley Sheep Co., 12 Wyo. 432, 76 P. 571,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 12 Wyo. 432, 76 P. 571,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1904).

Property rights. —

Where property rights are involved in a criminal prosecution, equity will intervene by injunction to protect such rights, if at all, not in restraint of the criminal proceedings, but rather in aid of the civil jurisdiction of the court, and will merely suspend criminal proceedings until property rights can be determined. Littleton v. Burgess, 14 Wyo. 173, 82 P. 864,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1905).

Remedy at law. —

In absence of defendant's insolvency, remedy at law is adequate to redress any injury suffered by plaintiff on account of any overt act of defendant in excluding plaintiff's cattle from open and unenclosed public lands. Anthony Wilkinson Live Stock Co. v. McIlquam, 14 Wyo. 209, 83 P. 364,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1905).

Trespass. —

In an action for an injunction to restrain defendants from driving their sheep upon private lands of plaintiffs, where it appeared that defendants had threatened to drive their sheep upon the range in which such lands lay, but it also appeared that there was only a single trespass, without any threats of continuance, and without any showing of permanent injury, and that shortly afterwards the sheep left the range, there was no ground for the issuance of an injunction. Healy v. Smith, 14 Wyo. 263, 83 P. 583,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1906).

Void statutes. —

Conceding that equity will restrain a criminal prosecution under a void statute, it will not try validity of the statute, and will not interfere until such statute has been declared void by the proper legal tribunal. Littleton v. Burgess, 14 Wyo. 173, 82 P. 864,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1905).

Cited

in

McCray v. Baker, 3 Wyo. 192, 18 P. 749,

1888 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1888).

§ 1-28-104.
Order of injunction and notice.

The order of injunction
shall be addressed to the party enjoined and shall state the injunction.
When the injunction is allowed at the commencement of the action,
the clerk shall endorse upon the summons “injunction allowed”, and
it is not necessary to issue the order of injunction; nor is it necessary
to issue the order when notice of the application has been given to
the party enjoined. Service of the summons so endorsed or the notice
of the application for an injunction is notice of its allowance.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 577; R.S. 1887, § 2925; R.S. 1899, § 4044; C.S. 1910, § 4904; C.S. 1920, § 6174; R.S. 1931, § 89-3508; C.S. 1945, § 3-6607; W.S. 1957, § 1-862; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-29-104

.

Cross references. —

As to service of summons, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Granting without notice. —

Statutes, by implication, permit granting of an injunction before answer and without notice. Anderson v. Englehart, 18 Wyo. 409, 108 P. 977,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1910).

§ 1-28-105.
Injunction operative from time of notice.

An injunction shall bind
the party from the time he has notice and the bond required is executed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 579; R.S. 1887, § 2927; R.S. 1899, § 4046; C.S. 1910, § 4906; C.S. 1920, § 6176; R.S. 1931, § 89-3510; C.S. 1945, § 3-6609; W.S. 1957, § 1-864; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-29-105

.

Undertaking. —

Where injunction was issued restraining county and prosecuting attorney from prosecuting a party for violating anti-gambling law, the undertaking properly ran to the attorney individually, as neither the state nor county was a party. Littleton v. Burgess, 16 Wyo. 58, 91 P. 832,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1907).

Suit on injunction bond. —

Under former § 1-861 and §§ 3-5301, 3-5303, 3-5310 and 3-5318, W.C.S. 1945, suit could not be maintained on an injunction bond pending petition in error from a judgment dissolving an injunction, though no supersedeas bond was filed. Tutty v. Ryan, 13 Wyo. 134, 78 P. 657,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1904), reh'g denied, 13 Wyo. 134, 79 P. 920,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1905).

§ 1-28-106.
When second application for injunction denied.

No injunction shall be
granted by a judge after a motion therefor has been overruled by his
court on the merits of the application. When it has been refused by
the court in which the action is brought, or a judge thereof, it shall
not be granted to the same applicant by a court of inferior jurisdiction,
or any judge thereof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 580; R.S. 1887, § 2928; R.S. 1899, § 4047; C.S. 1910, § 4907; C.S. 1920, § 6177; R.S. 1931, § 89-3511; C.S. 1945, § 3-6610; W.S. 1957, § 1-865; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-29-106

.

Temporary injunction. —

Motion for new trial in district court is not necessary to obtain review of an order denying motion to dissolve temporary injunction allowed pendente lite. Anderson v. Englehart, 18 Wyo. 196, 105 P. 571,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1909).

§ 1-28-107.
Enforcement
of injunction; penalties.

An injunction or restraining
order granted by a judge may be enforced as the act of the court,
and disobedience may be punished by the court as a contempt. An attachment
may be issued against the disobedient party upon satisfactory showing
by affidavit of the breach of the injunction or restraining order.
The disobedient party may be required by the court or judge to pay
a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200.00), to make immediate
restitution to the party injured and to give further security to obey
the injunction or restraining order. In default thereof, he may be
committed to custody until he complies with the requirements or is
otherwise legally discharged. Fines collected under this section shall
be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 581; R.S. 1887, § 2929; R.S. 1899, § 4048; C.S. 1910, § 4908; C.S. 1920, § 6178; R.S. 1931, § 89-3512; C.S. 1945, § 3-6611; W.S. 1957, § 1-866; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-29-107; 2009, ch. 168, § 203.

Cross references. —

As to attachment of the person generally, see §§

1-15-201

to

1-15-212

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “for the use of the county,” following “($200.00)” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence.

Strict construction. —

This section, which expressly provides imprisonment for nonpayment of fine, imposed for disobedience of an injunction, but not for nonpayment of costs, is penal, and should be strictly construed as giving no authority to imprison for nonpayment of costs. Porter v. State, 16 Wyo. 131, 92 P. 385,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1907).

Contempt. —

Judges are expressly authorized to punish for contempt for violation of injunctions under this section. Mau v. Stoner, 12 Wyo. 478, 76 P. 584,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1904), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218 (Wyo. 1905).

During the dependency of a declaratory judgment action to establish rights under an easement, plaintiff used the road across defendants'
property in violation of a court order; the district court acted within its jurisdiction in holding defendant in contempt of court and by imposing the punishment of forfeiture of the easement; the contempt proceeding was not rendered criminal even though the district court utilized criminal procedure. The course of the proceedings demonstrated that the contempt proceeding was civil pursuant to this section; the action was brought by a private party, rather than the state, to enforce compliance with the protections provided in the injunction.
Stephens v. Lavitt, 2010 WY 129, 239 P.3d 634,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2010).

Irregular judgment. —

Judgment of contempt for violating injunction prohibiting removal of improvements from mortgaged premises after foreclosure without issuing attachment and affidavit therefor before trial, was irregular. Federal Land Bank v. Sells, 40 Wyo. 498, 280 P. 98,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1929).

Review on appeal. —

A final order in contempt proceeding authorized by this section, where affecting a substantial right, and made in a special proceeding, and on a summary application in an action after final judgment, and in aid of such judgment, was reviewable on appeal, under former § 3-5301, W.C.S. 1945. Laramie Nat'l Bank v. Steinhoff, 7 Wyo. 464, 53 P. 299,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1898).

Reviewable on writ of error. —

Provisions of this section are not only punitive, but are in aid of plaintiff's remedy in main suit, and an order made in contempt proceeding authorized by it, which adjudges party guilty and imposes fine, is an order affecting a substantial right made in a special proceeding, is final, and reviewable on writ of error. Porter v. State, 16 Wyo. 131, 92 P. 385,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1907).

Cited

in

United Mine Workers, Local 1972 v. Decker Coal Co., 774 P.2d 1274,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Violation of automatic stay provisions of
1978 Bankruptcy Code (11 USC § 362) as contempt of court,
57 ALR Fed 927.

Federal government's liability for damages under 11 USC § 362(h) for willful violation of automatic stay in bankruptcy, 117 ALR Fed 1.

§ 1-28-108.
Additional security may be required.

At any time before judgment,
upon reasonable notice to the party who obtained the injunction, a
party enjoined may move the court or judge for additional security.
If it appears that the surety has removed from the state or is insufficient,
the court may vacate the injunction unless in a reasonable time sufficient
security is given.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 582; R.S. 1887, § 2930; R.S. 1899, § 4049; C.S. 1910, § 4909; C.S. 1920, § 6179; R.S. 1931, § 89-3513; C.S. 1945, § 3-6612; W.S. 1957, § 1-867; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-29-108.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery of damages resulting from wrongful issuance of injunction as limited to amount of bond, 30 ALR4th 273.

§ 1-28-109.
Affidavits used on hearing.

On the hearing of an
application for an injunction, each party may read affidavits, and
all affidavits shall be filed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 583; R.S. 1887, § 2931; R.S. 1899, § 4050; C.S. 1910, § 4910; C.S. 1920, § 6180; R.S. 1931, § 89-3514; C.S. 1945, § 3-6613; W.S. 1957, § 1-868; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-29-109.

§ 1-28-110.
Motion to vacate or modify injunction.

When an injunction has
been granted a party may, before trial, apply to the court in which
the action is pending, or a judge thereof, or to the supreme court
or a judge thereof, to vacate or modify the same. The party applying
for vacation or modification shall give the adverse party reasonable
notice of the time and place for hearing the motion. The application
may be made upon the petition and affidavits upon which the injunction
was granted, or upon affidavits of the party enjoined, with or without
answer.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 584; R.S. 1887, § 2932; R.S. 1899, § 4051; C.S. 1910, § 4911; C.S. 1920, § 6181; R.S. 1931, § 89-3515; C.S. 1945, § 3-6614; W.S. 1957, § 1-869; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-29-110.

Cross references. —

As to modification or vacation of judgment generally, see §§

1-16-401

to

1-16-409

.

Matters set up in affidavit. —

Where motion is made to vacate an injunction before answer, pursuant to statute authorizing such motion upon affidavits, judge may give same effect to defensive matters set up in affidavits as to such matters set up in an answer. Huber v. Delong, 54 Wyo. 240, 91 P.2d 53,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1939).

Cited

in

McBride v. Union Pac. R.R., 3 Wyo. 247, 21 P. 687,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1889); Smith v. Healy, 12 Wyo. 218, 75 P. 430,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1904).

§ 1-28-111.
Evidence on hearing of motion.

When the application
is made upon affidavits of the defendant but not otherwise, the plaintiff
may oppose the same by affidavits or other evidence in addition to
the evidence on which the injunction was granted.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 585; R.S. 1887, § 2933; R.S. 1899, § 4052; C.S. 1910, § 4912; C.S. 1920, § 6182; R.S. 1931, § 89-3516; C.S. 1945, § 3-6615; W.S. 1957, § 1-870; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-29-111.